Utah statutes.
58-26a-302.    Qualifications for licensure and registration -- Licensure by
endorsement.
(1)  Each applicant for licensure under this chapter as a certified public
accountant shall:
(a)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c)  show evidence of good moral character;
(d)  submit a certified transcript of credits from an accredited institution
acceptable to the board showing:
(i)  successful completion of a total of 150 semester hours or 225 quarter
hours of collegiate level education with a concentration in accounting,
auditing, and business;
(ii)  a baccalaureate degree or its equivalent at a college or university
approved by the board; and
(iii)  compliance with any other education requirements established by rule by
the division in collaboration with the board in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;
(e)  submit evidence of one year of accounting experience in a form prescribed
by the division;
(f)  submit evidence of having successfully completed the qualifying
examinations in accordance with Section 58-26a-306; and
(g)  submit to an interview by the board, if requested, for the purpose of
examining the applicant's competence and qualifications for licensure.
(2) (a)  The division may issue a license under this chapter to a person who
holds a license as a certified public accountant issued by any other
jurisdiction of the United States of America if the applicant for licensure by
endorsement:
(i)  submits an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(ii)  pays a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(iii)  shows evidence of good moral character;
(iv)  submits to an interview by the board, if requested, for the purpose of
examining the applicant's competence and qualifications for licensure; and
(v) (A) (I)  shows evidence of having passed the qualifying examinations; and
(II) (Aa)  meets the requirements for licensure which were applicable in this
state at the time of the issuance of the applicant's license by the
jurisdiction from which the original licensure by satisfactorily passing the
AICPA Uniform CPA Examination was issued; or
(Bb)  had four years of professional experience after passing the AICPA
Uniform CPA Examination upon which the original license was based, within the
10 years immediately preceding the application for licensure by endorsement;
or
(B)  shows evidence that the applicant's education, examination record, and
experience are substantially equivalent to the requirements of Subsection (1),
as provided by rule.
(b)  This Subsection (2) applies only to a person seeking to obtain a license
issued by this state and does not apply to a person practicing as a certified
public accountant in the state under Subsection 58-26a-305(1).
(3) (a)  Each applicant for registration as a Certified Public Accountant firm
shall:
(i)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division;
(ii)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(iii)  have, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a simple majority of
the ownership of the Certified Public Accountant firm, in terms of financial
interests and voting rights of all partners, officers, shareholders, members,
or managers, held by individuals who are certified public accountants,
licensed under this chapter or another jurisdiction of the United States of
America, and the partners, officers, shareholders, members, or managers, whose
principal place of business is in this state, and who perform professional
services in this state hold a valid license issued under Subsection
58-26a-301(2) or the corresponding provisions of prior law; and
(iv)  meet any other requirements established by rule by the division in
collaboration with the board in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(b)  Each separate location of a qualified business entity within the state
seeking registration as a Certified Public Accountant firm shall register
separately.
(c)  A Certified Public Accountant firm may include owners who are not
licensed under this chapter as outlined in Subsection (3)(a)(iii), provided
that:
(i)  the firm designates a licensee of this state who is responsible for the
proper registration of the Certified Public Accountant firm and identifies
that individual to the division; and
(ii)  all nonlicensed owners are active individual participants in the CPA
firm.
